Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 10 Miscellaneous

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 12, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 12-10-101.
Possessing, purchasing or selling an alcohol without liquid device prohibited; exception; definition; penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person shall possess, purchase, sell or offer to sell an alcohol without liquid device.

This section shall not apply to a hospital that operates primarily for the purpose of conducting scientific research, a state institution conducting bona fide research, a private college or university conducting bona fide research or to a pharmaceutical company or biotechnology company conducting bona fide research.

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for the first offense and not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for second and subsequent offenses.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any alcohol without liquid device found in Wyoming shall be confiscated and, after an opportunity for a hearing in a court of competent jurisdiction on the issue of whether the device is an alcohol without liquid device, shall be destroyed. The destruction of the device may be delayed if the device is needed for evidence in a criminal case.

As used in this section “alcohol without liquid device” means a device, machine, apparatus or appliance that mixes alcoholic liquor with pure or diluted oxygen to produce an alcohol vapor that an individual can inhale. An alcohol without liquid device does not include an inhaler, nebulizer, atomizer or other device that is designed and intended by the manufacturer to dispense a prescribed or over-the-counter medication.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 12, § 1.

§ 12-10-102.
Homemade beverage tastings.

In addition to any other privilege granted to a licensee under this title, a licensee may conduct an organized judging, tasting, exhibition, contest or competition of homemade beers, meads, wines or fermented fruit juices, or related events, at the premises or location where the licensee may legally serve alcoholic beverages. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to authorize any homemade beer, mead, wine or fermented fruit juice to be packaged or otherwise provided for consumption outside of the premises where the judging, tasting, exhibition, contest, competition or related event is occurring. The local licensing authority may restrict the portion of the premises that may be used for the judging, tasting, exhibition, contest, competition or related event. Homemade beers, meads, wines or fermented fruit juices provided at an event under this subsection shall not be provided for financial consideration.

A licensee shall not acquire any ownership interest in homemade beers, meads, wines or fermented fruit juices stored for any period to be provided at an event under this section. The homemade beers, meads, wines and fermented fruit juices stored for the event shall be clearly identified and shall be kept separate from the alcoholic and malt beverage stock of the licensee. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a licensee from using homemade beers, meads, wines and fermented juices in conducting an organized event under subsection (a) of this section.

As used in this section:

“Financial consideration” means value that is given or received directly or indirectly through sales, fees, charges, dues, contributions or donations. “Financial consideration” shall not include:

A tax deduction or credit for donating beer, mead, wine or fermented fruit juice to a nonprofit organization;

An event admission charge, cover charge or club or organization dues, if the amount of the charge or dues is independent of the amount of beer, mead, wine or fermented fruit juice to be provided or consumed at the event or through club or organization activities;

A prize awarded at a state or county fair or other organized judging, tasting, exhibition, contest or competition event at which consumption of a submitted beer, mead, wine or fermented fruit juice is offered without charge and only by the entrants, judges, exhibitors, contestants or competitors;

The receipt of homemade beer, mead, wine or fermented fruit juice manufactured by another person;

The receipt of beer, mead, wine or fermented fruit juice ingredients;

Wages and salaries paid by an educational organization for teaching brewing, winemaking, fermentation science or fermentation processes.

“Homemade” means made for noncommercial purposes;

“Noncommercial” means not sold, offered for sale or otherwise conditioned upon the provision or receipt of financial consideration.

History.

2016 ch. 86, § 1, effective March 4, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 86, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution.
Approved March 4, 2016.